Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-21-101. Purpose and intent.

It is the purpose and intent of the general assembly by this chapter to:

Provide for execution within Tennessee of the policies embodied in the federal Civil Rights Acts of 1964, 1968 and 1972, the Pregnancy Amendment of 1978 (42 U.S.C. § 2000e(k)), and the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 U.S.C. § 621 et seq.);

Assure that Tennessee has appropriate legislation prohibiting discrimination in employment, public accommodations and housing sufficient to justify the deferral of cases by the federal equal employment opportunity commission, the department of housing and urban development, the secretary of labor and the department of justice under those statutes;

Safeguard all individuals within the state from discrimination because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin in connection with employment and public accommodations, and because of race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin in connection with housing;

Protect their interest in personal dignity and freedom from humiliation;

Make available to the state their full productive capacity in employment;

Secure the state against domestic strife and unrest that would menace its democratic institutions;

Preserve the public safety, health and general welfare; and

Further the interest, rights, opportunities and privileges of individuals within the state.

The prohibitions in this chapter against discrimination because of age in connection with employment and public accommodations shall be limited to individuals who are at least forty (40) years of age.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-2101; Acts 1980, ch. 732, §§ 1-4; 1984, ch. 1007, § 1; 1986, ch. 807, § 1; 1988, ch. 714, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, referred to in this section, is compiled in numerous sections of 42 U.S.C.

The federal Civil Rights Act of 1968, referred to in this section, is compiled at 18 U.S.C. §§ 231-233, 241, 242, 245, 1153, 2101, 2102; 25 U.S.C. §§ 1301-1303, 1311, 1312, 1321-1326, 1331, 1341; 28 U.S.C. § 1360 notes; 42 U.S.C. §§ 1973j, 3533, 3535, 3601-3619, 3631.

The federal Civil Rights Act of 1972, referred to in this section, is codified, in part, in 20 U.S.C. § 1681.

For an Order establishing the Tennessee Title VI Compliance Commission, see Executive Order No. 34 (August 9, 2002).

Cross-References. Instruction on the prevention of hate crimes and sexual offenses, §49-7-137.

Maternity leave, §4-21-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71; 8 Tenn. Juris., Courts, § 30; 10 Tenn. Juris., Employer and Employee, §§ 64, 67.

Law Reviews.

Academic Standards or Discriminatory Hoops? Learning-Disabled Student-Athletes and the NCAA Initial Academic Eligibility Requirements, 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 1049 (1999).

Affirmatively Furthering Neighborhood Choice: Vacant Property Strategies and Fair Housing, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1009 (2016).

Confusion over “Comparables”: Will the Sixth Circuit Stick to One Standard with Respect to “Similarly Situated” Employees? (David L. Hudson Jr.), 37 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 25 (2001).

Effects of the Sutton Trilogy, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 705 (2001).

Employment Discrimination by Religious Institutions: Limiting the Sanctuary of the Constitutional Ministerial Exception to Religion-Based Employment Decisions, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2001).

FMLA Notice Requirements and the Chevron Test: Maintaining a Hard-Fought Balance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 261 (2002).

Government Contractors Beware: Recent Changes to Federal Affirmative Action Requirements (James Francis Barna), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Litigation in the Workplace: Age Discrimination (David A. Burkhalter II), 31 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 21 (1995).

Severe or Pervasive: An Analysis of Who, What, and Where Matters When Determining Sexual Harassment, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 355 (2013).

Perceived Disabilities, Social Cognition, and “Innocent Mistakes,” 55 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2002).

Proving an Employer's Intent: Disparate Treatment Discrimination and the Stray Remarks Doctrine After Reeves v. Sanderson plumbing Products, 55 V. L. Rev. 219 (2002).

Race and Economic Opportunity (Robert L. Woodson), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1017 (1989).

Raid on the Mountain: A 1963 trial in Blount county portrays the turbulence of the civil rights movement (R. Culver Schmid), 38 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2002).

Revisiting the Tennessee Employment-At-Will Doctrine — What Is the Exception and What Is the Rule? (Frederick J. Lewis, Jeffery A. Jarratt), 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1989).

Revitalizing Urban Cities: Linking the Past to the Present, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 973 (2016).

Saving Our Cities: Land Banking in Tennessee, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 927 (2016).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Senior Moments: Protecting Older Adults From Financial Exploitation: Proposed Federal Laws and Regulations, 52 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2016).

Tennessee Human Rights Act: Court of Appeals addresses limitations period of THRA (Timothy S. Bland and Licia M. Williams), 38 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2002).

The Court in Action: A summary of key cases from the U.S. Supreme Court 2000-2001 (Perry A. Craft and Arshad (Paku) Khan), 37 No. 10 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2001).

The Court's Response to the Reagan Civil Rights Agenda (Drew S. Days, III), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1003 (1989).

The Exclusiveness of an Employee's Workers' Compensation Remedy Against His Employer (Joseph H. King, Jr.) 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 405 (1988).

The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988: The Second Generation of Fair Housing (James A. Kushner), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1049 (1989).

The Faragher and Ellerth Problem: Lower Courts' Confusion Regarding the Definition of “Supervisor,” 54 Vand. L. Rev. 123 (2001).

The New ADA Backlash, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2014).

The Reagan Administration's Civil Rights Policy: The Challenge for the Future (William Bradford Reynolds), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 993 (1989).

The Sins of Innocence in Standing Doctrine, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 297 (2015).

Twenty-Five Years Later: Where Do We Stand on Equal Employment Opportunity Law Enforcement? (David L. Rose), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1121 (1989).

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).

Workers' Compensation — Anderson v. Standard Register Co.: Tennessee Supreme Court Specifies Elements Required to Establish a Cause of Action for Retaliatory Discharge in Workers' Compensation Cases, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 825 (1994).

Attorney General Opinions. Mediation by the Tennessee Human Rights Commission, OAG 94-115, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/6/94).

Tennessee human rights commission — Authority to investigate “improper administration of justice,” OAG 99-192, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 206 (9/28/99).

A judge who impartially applies state anti-discrimination law, as written and enacted by the General Assembly, is fulfilling the judicial duty to “uphold and apply the law,” not manifesting bias or prejudice or engaging in harassment. Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10, Rule 2.3 does not, nor could it, prevent a judge from faithfully applying that law in a case before the court. Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10, Rule 3.6 does not establish a religious test that excludes from office members of any religious organization, including ones that disapprove of or condemn homosexuality. Rule 3.6 is inapplicable to membership in religious organizations. OAG 18-17, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (4/3/2018).

4-21-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee human rights commission;

“Commissioner” means a member of the commission;

“Disability” means, with respect to a person:

A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more of such person's major life activities;

A record of having such an impairment; or

Being regarded as having such an impairment;

“Disability” does not include current, illegal use of, or addiction to, a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue;

“Discriminatory practices” means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin;

“Employer” means the state, or any political or civil subdivision thereof, and persons employing eight (8) or more persons within the state, or any person acting as an agent of an employer, directly or indirectly;

“Employment agency” means any person or agency, public or private, regularly undertaking, with or without compensation, to procure employees for an employer or to procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer;

“Familial status” means one (1) or more individuals, who have not attained eighteen (18) years of age, being domiciled with:

A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals; or

The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, with the written permission of such parent or other person. The protections against discrimination on the basis of familial status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or who is in the process of securing legal custody of any person who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age;

“Family” includes a single individual;

“Financial institution” means a bank, banking organization, mortgage company, insurance company or other lender to whom application is made for financial assistance for the purchase, lease, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair, maintenance or improvements of real property, or an individual employed by or acting on behalf of any of these;

“Hearing examiner” is one (1) or more persons or commissioners, designated by the commission to conduct a hearing. The commission has the sole power to determine qualifications of the hearing examiner;

“Housing accommodation” includes improved and unimproved property and means a building, structure, lot or part thereof that is used or occupied, or is intended, arranged or designed to be used or occupied, as the home or residence of one (1) or more individuals;

“Labor organization” includes any organization that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment or any agent acting for organizations;

“National origin” includes the national origin of an ancestor;

“Person” includes one (1) or more individuals, governments, governmental agencies, public authorities, labor organizations, corporations, legal representatives, partnerships, associations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, mutual companies, joint stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations or other organized groups of persons;

“Places of public accommodation, resort or amusement” includes any place, store or other establishment, either licensed or unlicensed, that supplies goods or services to the general public or that solicits or accepts the patronage or trade of the general public, or that is supported directly or indirectly by government funds, except that:

A bona fide private club is not a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement if its policies are determined solely by its members; and

Its facilities or services are available only to its members and their bona fide guests;

“Real estate broker” or “real estate salesperson” means an individual, whether licensed or not, who, on behalf of others, for a fee, commission, salary, or other valuable consideration, or who with the intention or expectation of receiving or collecting the same, lists, sells, purchases, exchanges, rents or leases real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options, or who negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others such activity; or who advertises or holds such individual out as engaged in such activities; or who negotiates or attempts to negotiate on behalf of others a loan secured by mortgage or other encumbrance upon a transfer of real estate, or who is engaged in the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for collection of a fee in connection with a contract whereby such individual undertakes to promote the sale, purchase, exchange, rental, or lease of real estate through its listing in a publication issued primarily for such purpose; or an individual employed by or acting on behalf of any of these;

“Real estate operator” means any individual or combination of individuals, labor unions, joint apprenticeship committees, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers or other legal or commercial entities, or the county or any of its agencies, that is engaged in the business of selling, purchasing, exchanging, renting or leasing real estate, or the improvements thereon, including options, or that derives income, in whole or in part, from the sale, purchase, exchange, rental or lease of real estate; or an individual employed by or acting on behalf of any of these;

“Real estate transaction” includes the sale, exchange, rental or lease of real property;

“Real property” includes buildings, structures, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest in these; and

“Sex” means and refers only to the designation of an individual person as male or female as indicated on the individual's birth certificate.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2102; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 5; 1984, ch. 1007, § 2; 1990, ch. 937, § 1; 1992, ch. 1027, § 1; 2008, ch. 706, § 1; 2011, ch. 278, § 2; 2012, ch. 848, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 278, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Equal Access to Intrastate Commerce Act.”

Law Reviews.

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. A judge who impartially applies state anti-discrimination law, as written and enacted by the General Assembly, is fulfilling the judicial duty to “uphold and apply the law,” not manifesting bias or prejudice or engaging in harassment. Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10, Rule 2.3 does not, nor could it, prevent a judge from faithfully applying that law in a case before the court. Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10, Rule 3.6 does not establish a religious test that excludes from office members of any religious organization, including ones that disapprove of or condemn homosexuality. Rule 3.6 is inapplicable to membership in religious organizations. OAG 18-17, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (4/3/2018).